Utah statutes.
57-8-24.   Common profits, common expenses, and voting rights.

The common profits of the property shall be distributed among, the common expenses shall be charged to, and the voting rights shall be available to, the unit owners according to their respective percentage or fractional undivided interests in the common areas and facilities.

